Arkansas, session 2025, HB1663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 9, Chapter 12, Subchapter 3, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
9-12-326. Prohibition or termination of alimony in cases of domestic
abuse or other domestic offenses.
(a)(1) If a petitioner for alimony was found to have committed an act
of domestic abuse in a matter brought under the Domestic Abuse Act of 1991, §
*LJH152*
03/03/2025 3:24:31 PM LJH152

HB1663
9-15-101 et seq., and the victim of the act of domestic abuse is the
respondent in the divorce or alimony petition, the court shall deny the
petitioner an award of alimony.
(2)(A) If a person currently receiving an award of alimony is
subsequently found to have committed an act of domestic abuse in a matter
brought under the Domestic Abuse Act of 1991, § 9-15-101 et seq., and the
victim of the act of domestic abuse is the payor of alimony, the court may
terminate the award of alimony from the date of the finding of domestic
abuse.
(B) A finding that a person currently receiving an award
of alimony has subsequently committed an act of domestic abuse in a matter
brought under the Domestic Abuse Act of 1991, § 9-15-101 et seq., shall be
considered a significant and material change in circumstances under § 9-12-
312(a)(7) when the victim of the act of domestic abuse is the payor of
alimony.
(b)(1) The court shall deny a petitioner for alimony an award of
alimony if the petitioner was convicted of any of the following offenses and
the victim of the offense is the respondent in the divorce or alimony
petition:
(A) Domestic battering in the first degree, § 5-26-303;
(B) Domestic battering in the second degree, § 5-26-304;
(C) Domestic battering in the third degree, § 5-26-305;
(D) Aggravated assault on a family or household member, §
5-26-306;
(E) First degree assault on family or household member, §
5-26-307;
(F) Second degree assault on a family or household member,
§ 5-26-308; or
(G) Third degree assault on a family or household member,
§ 5-26-309.
(2)(A) If a person currently receiving an award of alimony is
subsequently convicted of any of the offenses listed in subdivision (b)(1) of
this section and the victim of the offense is the payor of alimony, the court
may terminate the award of alimony from the date of the person's conviction.
(B) A finding that a person currently receiving an award
of alimony has been subsequently convicted of any of the offenses listed in
03/03/2025 3:24:31 PM LJH152

HB1663
subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be considered a significant and
material change in circumstances under § 9-12-312(a)(7) when the victim of
the offense is the payor of alimony.

































03/03/2025 3:24:31 PM LJH152